en: Mackerels
bg: Скумрия
de: Makrelen, Makrele
es: Caballa
fi: makrillit
fr: Maquereaux
hr: Skuše
it: Sgombro
ja: サバ, 鯖, さば
nl: Makreel
pl: Makrela, Makrele
ro: Macrou

en: Mackerel fillets, Mackerels fillets
bg: Филе от скумрия
de: Makrelenfilets
es: Filetes De Caballa
fi: Makrillifileet
fr: Filets de maquereaux
hr: Fileti skuše
it: Filetti di sgombro
nl: Makreelfilets
pl: Filety z makreli

en: Mackerel fillets in oil
de: Makrelenfilets in Öl
fi: Makrillifileet öljyssä
fr: Filets de maquereaux à l'huile
hr: Fileti skuše na ulju
it: Filetti di sgombro sott'olio
nl: Makreelfilet op olie
pl: Filety z makreli w oleju

en: Mackerel fillets in olive oil
fr: Filets de maquereaux à l'huile d'olive

en: Mackerel fillets in sunflower oil
fr: Filets de maquereaux à l'huile de tournesol

en: mackerel
fr: Maquereau

en: Fried mackerel
fr: Maquereau frit

en: Roasted mackerel, baked mackerel
fr: Maquereau rôti, maquereau cuit au four

en: Marinated mackerel
fr: Maquereau mariné

en: Atlantic chub mackerel
fr: Maquereau espagnol, Maquereau blanc, Maquereau billard

en: Horse mackerel
bg: Сафрид
fr: Chinchard
hr: Šur

en: Oily horse mackerel
fr: Chinchard gras

en: Lean horse mackerel
fr: Chinchard maigre

en: Mackerel fillets in mustard sauce, Canned mackerel fillets in mustard sauce
fi: Makrillifileet sinappikastikkeessa
fr: Filets de maquereaux à la moutarde, Maquereau filet sauce moutarde appertisé
hr: Fileti skuše u umaku od senfa
nl: Makreelfilets met mosterd
pl: Filety z makreli w sosie musztardowym

en: Mackerel fillets in white wine and herbs, Canned mackerel fillets in white wine
fi: Makrillifileet valkoviinissä yrteillä
fr: Filets de maquereaux au vin blanc et aromates, Maquereau filet au vin blanc appertisé
hr: Fileti skuše u bijelom vinu i začinskom bilju
nl: Makreelfilets in witte wijn en kruiden
pl: Filety z makreli w białym winie z ziołami

en: Mackerel fillets with tomato and basil, Mackerels fillets with tomato and basilisk
fr: Filets de maquereaux tomate-basilic
hr: Fileti skuše s rajčicom i bosiljkom
nl: Makreelfilets in tomatenbasilicumsaus

en: Mackerel fillets with tomato sauce, Mackerel fillet in tomato sauce canned
fi: Makrillifileet tomaattikastikkeella
fr: Filets de maquereau sauce tomate en conserve, Filets de maquereau sauce tomate appertisé
hr: Fileti skuše s umakom od rajčice
ro: Macrou file în sos tomat, File de macrou în sos de roșii

en: Mackerel fillets in escabeche
fr: Filets de maquereaux à l'escabeche

en: Mackerel fillets with olives and lemon, Mackerels fillets with olives and lemon
fr: Filets de maquereaux citron-olive
hr: Fileti skuše s maslinama i limunom
nl: Makreelfilets met Citroen-olijven

en: Plain mackerel fillets, Plain mackerels fillets
fr: Filets de maquereaux natures
hr: Obični fileti skuše
nl: Makreelfilets natuur